Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4 S TONE MOUNTAIN MEMORIAL ASSOCIATION
12-3-203. Revenue bonds - Signatures; seal.

All bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the association, shall be attested by the secretary thereof, and shall bear the official seal of the association. Any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature of the chairman of the association and may, if the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds so provides, be attested by the secretary of the association. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such persons, and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the association by such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized to hold the proper office, although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office. In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 13.)

12-3-204. Revenue bonds - Status as negotiable instruments; tax exemption for bonds and income therefrom.

All bonds issued under this part shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments laws of this state. Such bonds and the income thereof shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 14.)

12-3-205. Revenue bonds - Use and manner of disbursement of proceeds; procedure where proceeds are less than or greater than cost of projects.

The proceeds of bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman of the association or its duly bonded agents under such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indentures may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project, then unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit. These additional bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such bonds were issued, all surplus shall be paid into the sinking fund provided in Code Section 12-3-212 for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 15.)

12-3-206. Revenue bonds - Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the association may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 16.)

12-3-207. Revenue bonds - Replacement of mutilated, destroyed, or lost bonds.

The association may provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or is destroyed or lost.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 17.)

12-3-208. Revenue bonds - Immediate effectiveness of resolutions providing for issuance of bonds; time and manner of passage of resolutions.

Resolutions for the issuance of bonds may be adopted without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this part. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under this part shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted. Any such resolution may be passed at any regular, special, or adjourned meeting of the association by a majority of its members.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 18.)

12-3-209. Revenue bonds - Status as constituting debt or pledge of credit of state; effect of issuance of bonds on obligation of state to tax or make appropriations; recitals on face of bonds.

Bonds issued under this part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the credit of the state. Such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in Code Section 12-3-212; and the issuance of such bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatsoever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 19.)

12-3-210. Revenue bonds - Securing bonds by trust indenture.

In the discretion of the association, any issue of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the association and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state.

Resolutions providing for the issuance of bonds and trust indentures may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders, including the right to the appointment of a receiver for the project upon the default of any principal or interest payment upon the bonds thereof, and including the right of any receiver or indenture trustee to enforce collections of rents, revenues, or other charges for the use of the project necessary to pay all costs of operation, the principal and interest on the issue, the cost of collection, and all things reasonably necessary to accomplish the collection of such sums, in the event of any default of the association.

Such resolutions or trust indentures may include covenants setting forth the duties of the association in relation to the acquisition of the property, the construction of the project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional bonds may be issued. An indenture may also set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition, an indenture may contain such other provisions as the association may deem advisable, reasonable, and proper for the security of the bondholders.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the association.

All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated either as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by such indenture or as an administrative expense of the association.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 20.)

12-3-211. Revenue bonds - Designation of recipient of bond proceeds.

The association shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer or person who, or any agency, bank, or trust company which, shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply the same to the purposes expressed in this part, subject to such regulations as this part and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 21.)

12-3-212. Revenue bonds - Establishment of sinking funds for payment of principal, interest, and other costs.

The revenues, rents, and earnings derived from the project may be pledged by the association to the payment of principal and interest on bonds of the association as any resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or any trust instrument may provide. Such funds so pledged, from whatever source received, may include funds received from one or more or all sources and may be set aside into sinking funds at regular intervals which may be provided in any resolution or trust indenture.

All such sinking funds shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such bonds as such interest shall fall due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as provided in Code Section 12-3-199.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture; but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolutions or trust indentures, such sinking funds, individually, shall be funds for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the provisions of the trust indenture of any given bond issue, any moneys in all sinking funds, after all bonds and interest thereon for which such sinking funds were pledged have been paid, may be paid into the association fund provided for in Code Section 12-3-199.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 22.)

12-3-213. Revenue bonds - Revenue refunding bonds.

The association is authorized, subject to the provisions of any prior resolution or trust indenture, to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the association for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under this part and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the association in respect to the same shall be governed by this part insofar as the same may be applicable.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 23.)

12-3-214. Revenue bonds - Remedies of bondholders, coupon holders, and trustee.

Except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of bonds or by a trust indenture, any holder of revenue bonds or interest coupons issued under this part, any receiver for such holders, or any indenture trustee, if there are any, may either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia or granted by this part or under such resolution or trust indenture. Such holder, receiver, or trustee may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this part, or by resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the association or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects. In the event of default of the association upon the principal and interest obligations of any revenue bond issue, such holder, receiver, or trustee shall be subrogated to each and every right, specifically including the contract rights of collecting rental, which the association may possess against the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state and, in the pursuit of his or its remedies as subrogee, may proceed either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, to collect any sums by such proceedings due and owing to the association and pledged or partially pledged directly or indirectly to the benefit of the revenue bond issue of which such holder, receiver, or trustee is representative. No holder, receiver, or trustee shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon or the right to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state; nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon the property of the state, provided that any provision of this part or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any such holder, receiver, or trustee shall have the right by appropriate legal or equitable proceedings (including, without being limited to, mandamus) to enforce compliance by the appropriate public officials with the provisions of Article VII, Section IV of the Constitution of Georgia, and permission is given for the institution of any such proceedings to compel the payment of lease obligations.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 24; Ga. L. 1964, p. 357, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 49.)

12-3-215. Revenue bonds - Status as legal investment and as securities for deposits.

The bonds authorized by this part shall be securities in which all public officers and bodies of the state; all municipalities and all municipal subdivisions; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all banks, bankers, trust companies, saving banks, and saving associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 25.)

12-3-216. Revenue bonds - Protection of bondholders; part as constituting a contract with bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the association remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the association or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds; nor will the state itself in any way obstruct, prevent, impair, or render impossible the due and faithful performance of all project rental or lease contracts and all the covenants thereof entered into under this part. This part shall be for the benefit of the state, the association, and each and every holder of the association's bonds and, upon and after the issuance of bonds under this part, shall constitute an irrevocable contract with the holders of such bonds.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 29.)

12-3-217. Revenue bonds - Validation.

Bonds of the association shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 28.)

12-3-218. Moneys received by association as constituting trust funds; bondholders' lien on funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this part, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, tolls, and earnings, shall be deemed trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this part. The bondholders paying or entitled to receive the benefit of such funds shall have a lien on all such funds until applied as provided for in any resolution or trust indenture of the association.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 30.)

12-3-219. Association property, activities, income, and bonds exempt from taxation and assessment; facilities, services, and charges subject to certain taxes.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the association and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the association is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this part. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, this state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the association shall be required to pay no taxes or assessment upon any of the property acquired or leased by it under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the project erected by it, or upon any fees, rental, or other charges for the use of the facilities or services of the project, or upon other income received by the association. Further, this state covenants that the bonds of the association, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation from within the state.

Facilities, services, and charges for the use of facilities and services of any project owned or operated by the association shall not be exempt from and shall be subject to taxes under Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 48, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-51, and shall not be exempt from and shall be subject to any taxes on alcoholic beverages under Title 3, the "Georgia Alcoholic Beverage Code," to the extent that either or both such taxes are levied.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-51 to the contrary:

The association shall retain and not remit to the county or municipality levying such tax, in each fiscal year during which a tax is collected under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-51, an amount equal to the amount by which the total taxes collected under Code Section 48-13-51 exceed the taxes which would be collected at the rate of 3 percent;

The association shall expend the funds retained for the purposes of promotion and advertising of the project operated under the jurisdiction of the association from which the money was collected or for similar purposes of promoting, advertising, stimulating, and developing conventions and tourism in the county or municipality in which the project is operated as long as said promotion or advertising prominently features the project operated under the jurisdiction of the association; and

The association shall submit a report to the governing authority of the county or municipality levying such tax for each fiscal year during which a tax is collected under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-51 which report shall include the total funds retained by the association under this paragraph and the manner in which such funds were expended.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 26; Ga. L. 1995, p. 935, § 1.)

12-3-220. Venue and jurisdiction for actions under part.

Any action to declare, protect, or enforce any rights or duties under this part, brought in the courts of the state, shall be brought in the Superior Court of DeKalb County, Georgia; and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this part shall likewise be brought in such court, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 27; Ga. L. 1959, p. 333, § 3.)